public/spellcheck/he_TORANIT.aff
PFX a N 962
PFX a 0 ב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ב וו
PFX a 0 ב" .
PFX a 0 בו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 בכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 בכ וו
PFX a 0 בכ" .
PFX a 0 בכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ה וו
PFX a 0 ה" .
PFX a 0 הו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ו .
PFX a 0 ו" .
PFX a 0 וב [^ו]
PFX a 0 וב וו
PFX a 0 וב" .
PFX a 0 ובו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ובכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ובכ וו
PFX a 0 ובכ" .
PFX a 0 ובכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וה [^ו]
PFX a 0 וה וו
PFX a 0 וה" .
PFX a 0 והו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכ וו
PFX a 0 וכ" .
PFX a 0 וכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכב וו
PFX a 0 וכב" .
PFX a 0 וכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 וככ וו
PFX a 0 וככ" .
PFX a 0 וככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכל וו
PFX a 0 וכל" .
PFX a 0 וכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכמ וו
PFX a 0 וכמ" .
PFX a 0 וכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכמה וו
PFX a 0 וכמה" .
PFX a 0 וכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכש [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכש וו
PFX a 0 וכש" .
PFX a 0 וכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשב [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשב וו
PFX a 0 וכשב" .
PFX a 0 וכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשבכ וו
PFX a 0 וכשבכ" .
PFX a 0 וכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשה [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשה וו
PFX a 0 וכשה" .
PFX a 0 וכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשכ וו
PFX a 0 וכשכ" .
PFX a 0 וכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשכב וו
PFX a 0 וכשכב" .
PFX a 0 וכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשככ וו
PFX a 0 וכשככ" .
PFX a 0 וכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשכל וו
PFX a 0 וכשכל" .
PFX a 0 וכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשכמ וו
PFX a 0 וכשכמ" .
PFX a 0 וכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשכמה וו
PFX a 0 וכשכמה" .
PFX a 0 וכשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשל [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשל וו
PFX a 0 וכשל" .
PFX a 0 וכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשלכ וו
PFX a 0 וכשלכ" .
PFX a 0 וכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשמ וו
PFX a 0 וכשמ" .
PFX a 0 וכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשמה וו
PFX a 0 וכשמה" .
PFX a 0 וכשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 וכשמכ וו
PFX a 0 וכשמכ" .
PFX a 0 וכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ול [^ו]
PFX a 0 ול וו
PFX a 0 ול" .
PFX a 0 ולו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכ וו
PFX a 0 ולכ" .
PFX a 0 ולכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכש [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכש וו
PFX a 0 ולכש" .
PFX a 0 ולכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשב וו
PFX a 0 ולכשב" .
PFX a 0 ולכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשבכ וו
PFX a 0 ולכשבכ" .
PFX a 0 ולכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשה וו
PFX a 0 ולכשה" .
PFX a 0 ולכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשכ וו
PFX a 0 ולכשכ" .
PFX a 0 ולכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשכב וו
PFX a 0 ולכשכב" .
PFX a 0 ולכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשככ וו
PFX a 0 ולכשככ" .
PFX a 0 ולכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשכל וו
PFX a 0 ולכשכל" .
PFX a 0 ולכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשכמ וו
PFX a 0 ולכשכמ" .
PFX a 0 ולכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשכמה וו
PFX a 0 ולכשכמה" .
PFX a 0 ולכשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשל וו
PFX a 0 ולכשל" .
PFX a 0 ולכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשלכ וו
PFX a 0 ולכשלכ" .
PFX a 0 ולכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשמ וו
PFX a 0 ולכשמ" .
PFX a 0 ולכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשמה וו
PFX a 0 ולכשמה" .
PFX a 0 ולכשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ולכשמכ וו
PFX a 0 ולכשמכ" .
PFX a 0 ולכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומ וו
PFX a 0 ומ" .
PFX a 0 ומו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומה וו
PFX a 0 ומה" .
PFX a 0 ומהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומכ וו
PFX a 0 ומכ" .
PFX a 0 ומכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומש [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומש וו
PFX a 0 ומש" .
PFX a 0 ומשו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשב וו
PFX a 0 ומשב" .
PFX a 0 ומשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשבכ וו
PFX a 0 ומשבכ" .
PFX a 0 ומשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשה וו
PFX a 0 ומשה" .
PFX a 0 ומשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשכ וו
PFX a 0 ומשכ" .
PFX a 0 ומשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשכב וו
PFX a 0 ומשכב" .
PFX a 0 ומשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשככ וו
PFX a 0 ומשככ" .
PFX a 0 ומשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשכל וו
PFX a 0 ומשכל" .
PFX a 0 ומשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשכמ וו
PFX a 0 ומשכמ" .
PFX a 0 ומשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשכמה וו
PFX a 0 ומשכמה" .
PFX a 0 ומשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשל וו
PFX a 0 ומשל" .
PFX a 0 ומשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשלכ וו
PFX a 0 ומשלכ" .
PFX a 0 ומשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשמ וו
PFX a 0 ומשמ" .
PFX a 0 ומשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשמה וו
PFX a 0 ומשמה" .
PFX a 0 ומשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ומשמכ וו
PFX a 0 ומשמכ" .
PFX a 0 ומשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 וש [^ו]
PFX a 0 וש וו
PFX a 0 וש" .
PFX a 0 ושו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושב וו
PFX a 0 ושב" .
PFX a 0 ושבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושבכ וו
PFX a 0 ושבכ" .
PFX a 0 ושבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושה וו
PFX a 0 ושה" .
PFX a 0 ושהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכ וו
PFX a 0 ושכ" .
PFX a 0 ושכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכב וו
PFX a 0 ושכב" .
PFX a 0 ושכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושככ וו
PFX a 0 ושככ" .
PFX a 0 ושככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכל וו
PFX a 0 ושכל" .
PFX a 0 ושכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכמ וו
PFX a 0 ושכמ" .
PFX a 0 ושכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכמה וו
PFX a 0 ושכמה" .
PFX a 0 ושכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכש [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכש וו
PFX a 0 ושכש" .
PFX a 0 ושכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשב וו
PFX a 0 ושכשב" .
PFX a 0 ושכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשבכ וו
PFX a 0 ושכשבכ" .
PFX a 0 ושכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשה וו
PFX a 0 ושכשה" .
PFX a 0 ושכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשכ וו
PFX a 0 ושכשכ" .
PFX a 0 ושכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשכב וו
PFX a 0 ושכשכב" .
PFX a 0 ושכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשככ וו
PFX a 0 ושכשככ" .
PFX a 0 ושכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשכל וו
PFX a 0 ושכשכל" .
PFX a 0 ושכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשכמ וו
PFX a 0 ושכשכמ" .
PFX a 0 ושכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשכמה וו
PFX a 0 ושכשכמה" .
PFX a 0 ושכשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשל וו
PFX a 0 ושכשל" .
PFX a 0 ושכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשלכ וו
PFX a 0 ושכשלכ" .
PFX a 0 ושכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשמ וו
PFX a 0 ושכשמ" .
PFX a 0 ושכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשמה וו
PFX a 0 ושכשמה" .
PFX a 0 ושכשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושכשמכ וו
PFX a 0 ושכשמכ" .
PFX a 0 ושכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושל וו
PFX a 0 ושל" .
PFX a 0 ושלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכ וו
PFX a 0 ושלכ" .
PFX a 0 ושלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכש [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכש וו
PFX a 0 ושלכש" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשב וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשב" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשבכ וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשבכ" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשה וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשה" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשכ וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשכ" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשכב וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשכב" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשככ וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשככ" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשכל וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשכל" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשכמ וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשכמ" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשכמה וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשכמה" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשל וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשל" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשלכ וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשלכ" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשמ וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשמ" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשמה וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשמה" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושלכשמכ וו
PFX a 0 ושלכשמכ" .
PFX a 0 ושלכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמ וו
PFX a 0 ושמ" .
PFX a 0 ושמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמה וו
PFX a 0 ושמה" .
PFX a 0 ושמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמכ וו
PFX a 0 ושמכ" .
PFX a 0 ושמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמש [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמש וו
PFX a 0 ושמש" .
PFX a 0 ושמשו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשב וו
PFX a 0 ושמשב" .
PFX a 0 ושמשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשבכ [^ו]
